Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-104. Board of trustees — Creation — Members.

The administration and control of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be vested in a board called the “Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System”.

The board shall consist of nine (9) trustees, as follows:

The Auditor of State, the Treasurer of State, and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be ex officio members; and

Three (3) members who are state employees and three (3) members who are nonstate employees to be appointed by the Governor.

Each nonstate employee trustee and each state employee trustee shall have at least five (5) continuous years of service with a public employer or employers and shall be a member of the system.

No more than one (1) of the three (3) members who are nonstate employee trustees and no more than one (1) of the three (3) members who are state employee trustees may be a retired member of the system.

The term of office of appointed trustees shall be six (6) years.

The Governor shall declare a vacancy on the board when a:

Nonstate employee trustee leaves the employ of a participating public employer;

State employee trustee leaves state employment;

Member who is a nonstate employee trustee retires and there is another retired member of the system who is a nonstate employee trustee on the board; and

Member who is a state employee trustee retires and there is another retired member of the system who is a state employee trustee on the board.

A vacancy declared under subdivisions (c)(2)(A)(iii) and (iv) of this section shall be for the seat of the newly retired trustee.

The Governor shall appoint a state employee member or a nonstate employee member to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term within thirty (30) days of the date on which the vacancy is declared.

Annually, the board shall select from its membership a chair and a vice chair.

The board shall appoint an executive director who shall be the executive administrative officer of the system and shall also be ex officio secretary of the board, but who shall have no vote on questions before the board and who shall be directly responsible to the board.

By resolution duly adopted, the board may delegate to the executive director any of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon it by law.

Within such limitations as may be contained in legislative appropriations therefor, the executive director, subject to the approval of the board, may employ and fix the compensation of such secretarial, clerical, professional, and other personnel as may be required for the proper administration of the system.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 3; 1959, No. 42, § 3; 1965, No. 153, § 4; 1975, No. 732, § 1; 1985, No. 7, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2503; Acts 2017, No. 311, §§
1, 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 311, § 3, provided: “This act applies to a member currently serving on the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as of the effective date of this act [March 1, 2017].”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A) and (B); deleted “each nonstate employee trustee and” following “Governor” in (b)(2)(A); in (b)(2)(B), substituted “five (5)” for “ten (10)” and deleted “or retired member” following “shall be a member”; added (b)(2)(C); and rewrote (c)(2).

24-4-105. Board of trustees — Meetings — Powers and duties.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall hold meetings regularly, at least one (1) meeting in each quarter year, and shall designate the time and place of the meeting.

Special meetings may be held in accordance with such rules as the board shall adopt from time to time.

Five (5) trustees shall constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board, and at least five (5) concurring votes shall be necessary for a decision by the board at any of its meetings.

In addition to such other duties as are imposed upon the board by this act, the board shall:

Make all rules as it shall deem necessary from time to time in the transaction of its business and in administering the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

Provide for the administrative direction and control of the Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and such clerical staff as may be required in the administration of the system;

Provide for an actuarial valuation of the system as may be deemed necessary by the board;

Exercise discretionary power and authority in the investments of, and disbursements of, the funds of the system, subject to the provisions of this act;

Adopt such mortality and other tables of experience, and a rate or rates of interest, as shall be required in the proper operation of the system;

Perform the duties of trustee without additional compensation therefor, but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.; and

Do any and all things necessary for the proper administration of the system and for carrying out and making effective the provisions of this act.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 3; 1959, No. 42, § 3; 1965, No. 153, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2503; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 228; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2848, 2849.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2) and (b)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-4-101.

24-4-106. Limitations — Definition.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, it is considered sound public policy to limit contributions by public employers to one (1) state-authorized retirement plan. Accordingly, effective July 1, 1999, employers participating in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall not establish any other state-authorized plan that requires contributions by the employer.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall promulgate such rules as are required to prohibit the establishment of such plans in the future.

An employer that, in addition to participating in the system, has another state-authorized plan that was in existence on July 1, 1999, shall not be prohibited from:

Changing vendors for the plan;

Adding employees to the plan; or

Modifying a plan pursuant to federal guidelines.

If an employer merges with another employer and either employer has a plan that was in existence on July 1, 1999, then the merged entity may continue to provide the plan for employees of the entity.

The system shall notify all participating employers on an annual basis of the requirements of this section and the board rules governing this subject.

For the purpose of this section, “state-authorized plan” means any retirement plan authorized by state or federal law.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 884, § 1; 2001, No. 1299, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2850, 2851.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1)(B) and (b).

24-4-107. Proposals to establish or revise.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall present to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs information concerning the statutory authority and actuarial appropriateness of proposed board actions to establish or revise a multiplier, any benefit, or a provision of a deferred retirement option plan.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 4.

24-4-108. Implementation of contributory component.

It shall be considered sound public policy to encourage public employees in the State of Arkansas to participate in the development and growth of their individual retirement benefits.

In order that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System continues to maintain a strong funded status while ensuring that benefits provided to the annuitants and beneficiaries of the system maintain a constant purchasing power, it is incumbent upon the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to consider reintroducing employee contributions as a required provision of the plan structure.

In accordance with the rules of the board, there shall be an annual review of the actuarial valuation of the plan as provided by its actuary.

During each annual review, the board shall consider the actuarial appropriateness of establishing a contributory component within the system.

Issues to be considered are to include, but not be limited to:

Mitigating additional increases in the employer contribution rate;

The establishment of a tax deferral of employee contributions under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C.S. § 414(h), as in effect on January 1, 2003;

The establishment of a time horizon in which current system members may elect contributory status; and

The extent of benefit portability.

Beginning July 1, 2005, the board shall implement and establish a contributory plan for members of the system.

The board shall develop policies and rules from its annual review of the contributory component of the system and, as a minimum, the board's rules shall provide for:

The member contribution rate;

The annual multiplier rate for benefits that a contributory member of the system shall receive upon becoming eligible to receive a retirement benefit;

The combining of contributory and noncontributory service together to receive a retirement benefit from the system; and

Any other contributory qualifications or requirements necessary to implement the contributory plan for the system.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 339, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2852, 2853.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice in (c)(2).

24-4-109. Compliance with federal regulation.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall promulgate rules as it deems necessary from time to time in order to fully comply with federal requirements that may affect the members or the members' benefits under this subchapter.

In meeting its obligation to its members, the board may promulgate rules to:

Establish the regular retirement age for members consistent with the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.S. § 411; and

Maintain the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System's retirement plan tax qualification status by the federal government to remain tax exempt and tax qualified under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 745, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-107 and subchapters 2-10 of this chapter may not apply to this section, which was enacted subsequently.

24-4-110. Failure to terminate — Commencement of annuity payments — Election to retire.

A retirant shall not begin receiving annuity payments until all requirements for terminating qualified employment are satisfied.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 332, § 6.

24-4-111. Failure to meet termination requirements — Member's retirement election.

The failure to meet termination requirements does not revoke a member's retirement election.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 332, § 7.

Subchapter 2
— Funds and Management of Assets

Effective Dates.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 17: Mar. 7, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a State Employees Retirement System is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled state employees and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that the Board of Trustees herein created be appointed, organize and establish the necessary rules and forms to be followed upon the establishment of the retirement system herein created on July 1, 1957. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 42, § 16: Feb. 13, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of county employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled county employees; that the coverage is best obtained by including the county employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that it is necessary for the Board of Trustees of said Arkansas State Employees Retirement System to organize and establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of county employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 64, § 9: Feb. 8, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of municipal employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled municipal employees; that the coverage is best obtained by permitting the inclusion of municipal employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System shall establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of municipal employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 153, § 15: Mar. 9, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “This act shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 663, § 8: Mar. 23, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 754, § 3: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present method of collecting funds by the Public Employees Retirement System from counties for the payment of benefits to retired County Constitutional Officers is inadequate and resulting in an extreme financial burden on the Public Employees Retirement System, and that the provisions of this Act will relieve the Public Employees Retirement System of such financial strain; that under Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, Acts without an emergency clause become effective 90 days after final adjournment of the General Assembly; that it may be necessary to extend the Session, as authorized in Article 5, Section 17 of the Constitution and that an extension of the Session might result in this Act not becoming effective until after July 1, 1977, unless an emergency is declared; and that it is essential that this Act go into effect on July 1, 1977. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1977, No. 793, § 12: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a uniform retirement policy for the State of Arkansas is essential to maintain employee morale and a stable and improved retirement system commensurate with the ability of the taxpayers of this State to finance, yet without jeopardizing retirement benefits of persons now employed by the State who do not elect to participate in the new retirement plan. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1977 (Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 3: Aug. 15, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that if Arkansas Counties are required to fully fund the retirement reserve fund for County-Elected Constitutional Officers during one fiscal year, Arkansas Counties will be unable to maintain their necessary operations and fund the retirement reserve fund at the same time. It is also hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some confusion has arisen regarding the full intent of the General Assembly when it enacted Act 754 of 1977 relating to the retirement of county-elected constitutional officers; that it is essential to the proper administration of the provisions of the Public Employees Retirement System that the intent of Act 754 be clarified at the earliest possible date; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 373, § 3: Mar. 12, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the financial solvency of the County and Municipal Divisions of the Public Employees Retirement System that adequate provision be made by law for the orderly funding of the actuarial liabilities incurred by new legislative enactments which expand or increase the liabilities of said Division, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to provide procedures for such funding with respect to retirement enactments by the General Assembly which may incur greater actuarial liabilities than contemplated by the General Assembly at the time such legislation is enacted. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 653, § 2: Mar. 29, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present procedure for funding the Retirement Reserve Fund for County Elected Constitutional Officers who retired prior to July 1, 1978 over a period of five (5) years is causing a serious financial hardship on some counties; that this Act is designed to provide for such funding over a period of ten (10) years and to thereby partially alleviate this problem and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 715, § 9: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Public Retirement laws need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the systems and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 859, § 19: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the system and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 677, § 10: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Public Employees Retirement System law need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the system and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1093, § 6: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that immediate passage and approval of this act is necessary to render finality to annuity determinations made by the Public Employees Retirement System Board and to prevent the hardship and instability that results from the recoupment of the overpayments of incorrectly calculated annuity payments to retired State employees for a protracted period of time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 398, § 9: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1995, is essential to the operation of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 1292, § 9: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that employees of Rural Waterworks Facilities Boards created by Act 617 of 1995 should be entitled to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted this act might not become effective until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 76, § 10: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention Council of the Tenth Judicial District created by uncodified Act 899 of 1995 should be entitled to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted this act might not become effective until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 299, § 28: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need clarification, standardization, and repeal and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 308, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the creation of a Local Government Division will improve the financial position of the system resulting in more stable contribution rates for non-state participating employers with enhanced benefits for members and retirees of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and for the effective administration of the system in this act must be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year because computations are made at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 67, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 11: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 332, § 13: Mar. 14, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is vital that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System be permitted to immediately implement policies regarding the termination of employment, eligibility of employees to receive benefits, availability of information, and when to pay interest on employee contributions; and to clarify the meaning of terms in the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated to avoid the undue consumption of the system's resources. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 448, § 13: Mar. 13, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the system are in imminent need of revision; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-4-201. Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund — Creation — System accounts.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration a fund to be known as the “Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund”.

This fund shall consist of trust funds as provided by law and shall be used for the payment of personal services, operating expenses, investments, benefits, refunds, and for such other purposes as may be authorized by law.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall have the authority to establish a division or divisions for the various participating employers as necessary to administer the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The retirement system accounts shall be the members' deposit account, the employers' accumulation account, the retirement reserve account, the income account, and such other accounts as the board shall establish from time to time.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 4; 1959, No. 42, § 4; 1961, No. 64, § 2; 1981, No. 859, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2504; Acts 1997, No. 299, § 8; 1999, No. 308, § 1; 2001, No. 67, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 3551.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(1).

24-4-202. Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund — Contributions.

On or after July 1, 2017, the state employer contributions made by a state agency which employs each member provided for in § 24-2-701 shall be:

Reported electronically by the state agency through the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System portal; and

Paid by electronic transfer by the state agency.

The employer's contribution shall be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund at the time and with the frequency established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and shall be paid concurrently with the contributions made by its employees to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund.

In the case of employees receiving part or all of their compensation from federal funds, the disbursing officer of the agency receiving the federal funds shall transmit such sums to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund from federal funds of the agency.

These sums shall be those sums of money which are necessary to provide the employer contributions provided for in § 24-2-701, based on the portions of the employees' compensation payable from federal funds.

In the case of the Local Government Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, each participating public employer shall pay into the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund such sums of money as are necessary to provide the participating public employer's contributions provided for in § 24-2-701.

The participating public employer's contributions shall be paid at the time and with the frequency established by the board and shall be paid concurrently with the contributions made by its employees to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund.

On or after July 1, 2017, the contributions made by a participating public employer shall be made by electronic transfer.

The employer's contributions shall be transmitted to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund in such form and manner, together with such supporting data, as the board shall prescribe from time to time.

In the case of circuit court reporters, the public employer contributions shall be paid, when directed by the board, by the respective counties in the proportion that each county pays the total salaries of the circuit court reporters.

If any participating public employer fails to remit to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System those moneys which are required by law or rule by the date and at the frequency established by the board, the system shall impose a penalty equal to the actuarially assumed rate of return on investments of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund in the form of interest on an annual basis on the moneys due.

This interest shall be computed on the actual days of delinquency and shall be paid to the system for the purpose of reimbursing the trust fund for the money which would have been earned on the moneys had they been paid when due.

The interest penalty shall be determined by the system on the date the delinquent funds are received, and a statement of the interest shall be sent to the participating public employer.

If the interest penalty or delinquent moneys are not received by the system by the last business day of the month in which the moneys were originally due, then the system shall cause the sums of moneys, including interest, to be transferred from any moneys due the participating public employer from the office of the Treasurer of State or the Department of Education as approved in § 19-5-106(a)(5).

If any participating public employer fails to file with the system the retirement report by the date established by the board, the system shall impose a penalty of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each time the report is late.

A statement of the penalty shall be sent to the participating employer.

If the penalty is not received by the last business day of the month in which the report was due, then the system shall cause the amount to be transferred from any moneys due the participating public employer from the office of the Treasurer of State or the Department of Education as provided in § 19-5-106(a)(5).

A participating public employer shall submit a written request for a temporary waiver to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on or before July 1, 2017, when the participating public employer is unable to:

Report contributions electronically through the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; or

Pay contributions by electronic transfer.

A request for a temporary waiver shall include a timeline for when the participating public employer will be able to comply with payment and reporting requirements under this section.

A participating public employer shall promptly upon request by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System provide all information requested concerning the status of an employee to the system.

It is the sole responsibility of the reporting participating public employer to ensure that the information provided by the participating public employer, including without limitation the participating public employer's wage reporting and contribution remittances, is accurate.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 4; 1959, No. 42, § 4; 1961, No. 64, § 2; 1967, No. 108, § 1; 1977, No. 663, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2504; Acts 1993, No. 286, § 4; 1995, No. 398, § 4; 1995, No. 1292, § 4; 1997, No. 76, § 5; 1997, No. 299, § 9; 2001, No. 151, § 12; 2013, No. 332, § 8; 2015, No. 91, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2854.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Local Government Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (g).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(1); added (c)(2)(B) and redesignated former (c)(2) as (c)(2)(A); inserted (g); redesignated former (g) as (h); and added (i).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (e)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1957, No. 177, codified as §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-105, 24-4-201, 24-4-202, 24-4-205, 24-4-207 — 24-4-209, 24-4-301 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401, 24-4-402, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-512, 24-4-513 [repealed], 24-4-601 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605, 24-4-606.

24-4-203, 24-4-204. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning penalties for delinquency and audit of officers, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. They were derived from the following sources:

24-4-203. Acts 1957, No. 177, § 4; 1959, No. 42, § 4; 1961, No. 64, § 2; 1979, No. 715, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2504; Acts 1989, No. 407, § 1; 1991, No. 234, § 1.

24-4-204. Acts 1957, No. 177, § 4; 1959, No. 42, § 4; 1961, No. 64, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2504.

24-4-205. State as trustee.

The promulgation of this chapter shall constitute an offer by the state to serve as trustee for the funds collected under the provisions of this chapter, as well as a guarantee that the disbursement thereof shall be in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and that none of the funds shall be used for any purpose except the purposes provided for in this Act.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 12; 1959, No. 42, § 12; 1961, No. 64, § 6; 1965, No. 153, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2512; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 13.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-4-202.